Vermont, session 2025-2026, H181.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. FINDINGS AND INTENT
The General Assembly finds:
(1) It is in the public interest to foster standards for buildings fit for
occupancy that are safe, healthful, comfortable, durable, energy efficient,
sustainable, resilient, and practicable.
(2) The five-year Housing Needs Assessment, released by Agency of
Commerce and Community Development in June 2024, found that at least
24,000 and as many as 36,000 housing units must be brought online by 2029.
In addition, the Assessment says about 20,000 existing homes have indications
of housing quality concerns according to 2022 census data.
(3) The Housing Needs Assessment also found that 32 percent of renters
had the income needed to buy a median priced home in 2021; two years later,
in 2023, house prices had risen to the extent that only six percent of renters
could likewise afford to buy a home.
(4) Buildings, whether single family owner-occupied, apartment houses,
or commercial occupancies, typically remain in service for many decades
without major renovation.
(5) As the costs of building increase, the costs of remediating poor or
energy inefficient construction exceed the capability or inclination of many
owners to undertake.
VT LEG #380156 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.181
2025 Page 3 of 9
(6) Recent floods have further exacerbated Vermont’s housing crisis and
demand for construction workers, and likely brought less experienced builders
into the construction market.
(7) Vermont established the Residential Building Energy Standards
(RBES) in 1997 and the Commercial Building Energy Standards (CBES) in
2007, collectively referred to as “energy codes.” Both energy codes are
mandatory, but studies in recent years show compliance with the RBES at
about 54 percent and CBES at about 87 percent, with both rates declining.
Both codes are scheduled to become more stringent with the goal of “net zero
ready” by 2030.
(8) There is no State agency or office designated to interpret, administer,
and enforce energy codes. The Division of Fire Safety in the Department of
Public Safety is responsible for fire and building safety code in “public
buildings.” The Department of Public Service is responsible for promulgating
and updating RBES and CBES. Neither office has the capacity to administer
or enforce energy codes.
(9) Applicability of energy codes and building codes in Vermont is
inconsistent. The RBES apply to residential buildings up to three stories; the
CBES apply to all other building types. The Division of Fire Safety
jurisdiction encompasses all public buildings, including rented residential
buildings covered by the RBES. However, its fire and building safety code is
VT LEG #380156 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.181
2025 Page 4 of 9
based on commercial codes; in residential buildings, it applies only to
apartment buildings four stories and above. While as of late 2024 the Division
of Fire Safety is in the process of considering adopting a residential building
code, currently Vermont has no building code covering residential construction
up to three stories in height. Further, the Department of Public Service has
advised the General Assembly that RBES-enabling legislation does not provide
clear authority for municipalities to administer and enforce the RBES at the
local level.
Sec. 2. 2024 Acts and Resolves No. 151, Sec. 2 is amended to read:
Sec. 2. ENERGY CODE COMPLIANCE; WORKING GROUP
* * *
(f) Meetings.
* * *
(4) The Working Group shall cease to exist on July 1, 2026 30 days after
the General Assembly enacts legislation giving authority to a State entity to
enforce the building energy codes.
* * *
Sec. 3. 30 V.S.A. § 209(d) is amended to read:
(d) Energy efficiency.
* * *
(2) Appointment of independent efficiency entities.
VT LEG #380156 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.181
2025 Page 5 of 9
(A) Electricity and natural gas. In place of utility-specific programs
developed pursuant to this section and section 218c of this title, the
Commission shall, after notice and opportunity for hearing, provide for the
development, implementation, and monitoring of gas and electric energy
efficiency and conservation programs and measures, including programs and
measures delivered in multiple service territories, by one or more entities
appointed by the Commission for these purposes. The Commission may
include appropriate combined heat and power systems that result in the
conservation and efficient use of energy and meet the applicable air quality
standards of the Agency of Natural Resources. Except with regard to a
transmission company, the Commission may specify that the appointment of
an energy efficiency utility to deliver services within an electric utility’s
service territory satisfies that electric utility’s corresponding obligations, in
whole or in part, under section 218c of this title and under any prior orders of
the Commission. The entities appointed under this subdivision (2) shall
attribute energy savings to building energy code compliance. The Department
of Public Service shall establish a procedure for calculating those building
energy savings.
* * *
VT LEG #380156 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.181
2025 Page 6 of 9
Sec. 4. 30 V.S.A. § 51 is amended to read:
§ 51. RESIDENTIAL BUILDING ENERGY STANDARDS; STRETCH
CODE
* * *
(c) Revision and interpretation of energy standards. The Commissioner of
Public Service shall amend and update the RBES by means of administrative
rules adopted in accordance with 3 V.S.A. chapter 25. On or before January 1,
2011, the Commissioner shall complete rulemaking to amend the energy
standards to ensure that, to comply with the standards, residential construction
must be designed and constructed in a manner that complies with the 2009
edition of the IECC. After January 1, 2011, the Commissioner may direct the
timely and appropriate revision of the RBES after the issuance of updated
standards for residential construction under the IECC. The Department of
Public Service shall provide technical assistance and expert advice to the
Commissioner in the interpretation of the RBES and in the formulation of
specific proposals for amending the RBES. Prior to final adoption of each
required revision of the RBES, the Department of Public Service shall convene
an Advisory Committee to include one or more mortgage lenders, builders,
building designers, utility representatives, and other persons with experience
and expertise, such as consumer advocates and energy conservation experts.
The Advisory Committee may provide the Commissioner with additional
VT LEG #380156 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.181
2025 Page 7 of 9
recommendations for revision of the RBES after they review the associated
software and handbook guidance for the update.
(1) Any amendments to the RBES shall be:
(A) consistent with duly adopted State energy policy, as specified in
section 202a of this title, and consistent with duly adopted State housing
policy;
(B) evaluated relative to their technical applicability and reliability;
and
(C) cost-effective and affordable from the consumer’s perspective.
(2) Each time the RBES are amended by the Commissioner, the
amended RBES shall become effective upon a date specified in the adopted
rule, a date that shall not be less than three six months after the date of
adoption. Persons commencing residential construction before the effective
date of the amended RBES shall have the option of complying with the
applicable provisions of the earlier or the amended RBES. After the effective
date of the original or the amended RBES, any person commencing residential
construction shall comply with the most recent version of the RBES.
* * *
Sec. 5. 10 V.S.A. § 582 is amended to read:
§ 582. GREENHOUSE GAS INVENTORIES; REGISTRY
* * *
VT LEG #380156 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.181
2025 Page 8 of 9
(g) Greenhouse gas accounting.
(1) In consultation with the Department of Public Service created under
30 V.S.A. § 1, the Secretary shall research and adopt by rule greenhouse gas
accounting protocols that achieve transparent and accurate life cycle
accounting of greenhouse gas emissions, including emissions of such gases
from the use of fossil fuels and from renewable fuels such as biomass. On
adoption, such protocols shall be the official protocols to be used by any
agency or political subdivision of the State in accounting for greenhouse gas
emissions.
(2) The Department of Public Service, in consultation with the energy
efficiency utilities, the Office of Economic Opportunity’s Home
Weatherization Assistance Program, and any other entities claiming energy or
emissions savings, shall develop a methodology for calculating and reporting
greenhouse gas reductions annually.
Sec. 6. 26 V.S.A. § 5501 is amended to read:
§ 5501. REGISTRATION REQUIRED
(a) A person shall register with the Office of Professional Regulation prior
to contracting with a homeowner to perform residential construction in
exchange for consideration of more than $10,000.00 $2,000.00, including labor
and materials.
* * *
VT LEG #380156 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.181
2025 Page 9 of 9
Sec. 7. 26 V.S.A. § 5509 is amended to read:
§ 5509. REQUIREMENTS OF REGISTRANTS
(a) Insurance. A person registered under this chapter shall maintain
minimum liability insurance coverage in the amount of $1,000,000.00 per
occurrence and $2,000,000.00 aggregate, evidence of which may be required
as a precondition to issuance or renewal of a registration if the estimated value
of the labor and materials exceeds $10,000.00.
* * *
Sec. 8. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380156 v.2